Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.11, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 3. a. The following areas shall be taught in grades one through six: English-language arts, social studies, mathematics, science, health, physical education, traffic safety, music, visual art, and, subject to section 279.80, age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development. b. Computer science instruction incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be offered in at least one grade level commencing with the school year beginning July 1, 2023. c. In grades five and six, the age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development instruction shall incorporate the standards established under section 279.50, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . d. The health curriculum shall include the characteristics of communicable diseases. Senate File 175, p. 2 e. The state board as part of accreditation standards shall adopt curriculum definitions for implementing the elementary program. 4. The following shall be taught in grades seven and eight: English-language arts; social studies, including instruction related to civics; mathematics; science; health; age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development that incorporates the standards established under section 279.50, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ ; career exploration and development; physical education; music; and visual art. Computer science instruction incorporating the standards established under section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), shall be offered in at least one grade level commencing with the school year beginning July 1, 2023. Career exploration and development shall be designed so that students are appropriately prepared to create an individual career and academic plan pursuant to section 279.61 , incorporate foundational career and technical education concepts aligned with the six career and technical education service areas as defined in subsection 5 , paragraph âhâ , incorporate relevant twenty-first century skills to facilitate career readiness, and introduce students to career opportunities within the local community and across this state. The health curriculum shall include age-appropriate and research-based information regarding the characteristics of sexually transmitted diseases. The state board as part of accreditation standards shall adopt curriculum definitions for implementing the program in grades seven and eight. However, this subsection shall not apply to the teaching of career exploration and development in nonpublic schools. Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph j, subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1) One unit of health education which may include personal health; food and nutrition; environmental health; safety and survival skills; consumer health; family life; age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development that incorporates the standards established under section 279.50, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ ; substance use disorder and nonuse; emotional and social health; health resources; cardiopulmonary Senate File 175, p. 3 resuscitation; and prevention and control of disease, including age-appropriate and research-based information regarding sexually transmitted diseases. Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (01) The educational standards of section 256.11 relating to the human growth and development curriculum for grades five through eight or the health curriculum for grades nine through twelve. Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 256.11 relating to the human growth and development curriculum for grades five through eight and the health curriculum for grades nine through twelve. Sec. 5. Section 279.50, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2. a. Subject to section 279.80 , each school board shall provide age-appropriate and research-based instruction in human growth and development including instruction regarding self-esteem, stress management, interpersonal relationships, and domestic abuse in grades one through six. b. (1) In grades five and six, the age-appropriate and research-based instruction in human growth and development described in paragraph âaâ shall include all of the following: (a) Instruction related to human development inside the womb. (b) A high-definition ultrasound video showing the presence of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal development. (c) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation, or an ultrasound or other real image, that depicts the humanity of the unborn child by showing prenatal human development, starting at fertilization, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development throughout every stage of pregnancy. (2) The age-appropriate and research-based instruction in human growth and development described in paragraph âaâ shall not include any book, article, outline, handout, video, or Senate File 175, p. 4 other educational material produced or provided by an entity that does any of the following: (a) Performs abortions. (b) Promotes abortions. (c) Contracts or subcontracts with an entity that performs or promotes abortions. (d) Becomes or continues to be an affiliate of any entity that performs or promotes abortions. (e) Regularly makes referrals to an entity that provides or promotes abortions. c. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer and interpret this subsection. 3. a. Each school board shall provide age-appropriate and research-based instruction in human growth and development including instruction regarding human sexuality, self-esteem, stress management, interpersonal relationships, domestic abuse, and the prevention and control of disease, including sexually transmitted diseases as required in section 256.11 , in grades seven through twelve. b. (1) The age-appropriate and research-based instruction in human growth and development described in paragraph âaâ shall include all of the following: (a) Instruction related to human development inside the womb. (b) A high-definition ultrasound video showing the presence of the brain, heart, and other vital organs in early fetal development. (c) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation, or an ultrasound or other real image, that depicts the humanity of the unborn child by showing prenatal human development, starting at fertilization, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development throughout every stage of pregnancy. (2) The age-appropriate and research-based instruction in human growth and development described in paragraph âaâ shall not include any book, article, outline, handout, video, or other educational material produced or provided by an entity that does any of the following: (a) Performs abortions. Senate File 175, p. 5 (b) Promotes abortions. (c) Contracts or subcontracts with an entity that performs or promotes abortions. (d) Becomes or continues to be an affiliate of any entity that performs or promotes abortions. (e) Regularly makes referrals to an entity that provides or promotes abortions. c. The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer and interpret this subsection. Sec. 6. Section 279.50, subsection 10, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. âResearch-basedâ means all of the following: (1) Complete complete, unbiased information that is verified or supported by the weight of research conducted in compliance with accepted scientific methods ; , recognized as medically accurate and objective by leading professional organizations and agencies with relevant expertise in the field, such as the American college of obstetricians and gynecologists, the American public health association, the American academy of pediatrics, and the national association of school nurses; and published in peer-reviewed journals where appropriate. (2) Information that is free of racial, ethnic, sexual orientation, and gender biases. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 175, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor